Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-403
Peace officer; right to inspect property and records.

During the usual and customary business hours of a secondary metals recycler, any peace officer shall have the right to inspect:

(1) Any and all purchased regulated metals property in the possession of the secondary metals recycler; and

(2) Any and all records required to be maintained under section 69-402.

Laws 2008, LB766, § 3.
September 1, 2008